California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding any provisions of this article or Sections 16336 and 16339 thereof to the contrary, any school district, which has issued at least thirty-seven million dollars ($37,000,000) in bonds for the purpose of replacing structurally unsafe buildings and which lacks sufficient matching funds for a particular project or projects, as required under this article, may apply and the board may approve, a project or projects conditioned upon the district having levied or being required to levy, in the fiscal years 1974–75, 1975–76, and 1976–77, the entire twenty
 cent ($0.20) tax rate per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation permitted under Section 39230 and applying the entire proceeds therefrom as local matching funds to an eligible project or projects.

Under those circumstances, the board may increase the basic computed state matching ratio of assistance in the amount which, when added to the sum of (1) the entire proceeds which have been collected from the aforementioned twenty cent ($0.20) tax levies at the time of the application and not yet applied as matching funds to previously approved projects and (2) any other funds which in the opinion of the board are or can be made currently available for the project or projects, would be necessary to construct minimum essential facilities for the project or projects as determined by the board. Not more than six million dollars ($6,000,000) of the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by Section 16310, may be apportioned pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16339.8.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, the State Allocation Board may appropriate to the Marysville Joint Unified School District a sum not to exceed seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) for costs incurred in repairing damage at Lindhurst High School, which was constructed pursuant to this article as a replacement of facilities not complying with earthquake safety requirements. The need for the repair of Lindhurst High School may have been caused by improper construction or design. Therefore, the proceeds received from any insurance or
 arbitration award, or any other action, shall be paid by the district to the board as a direct reduction in the apportionment made under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16340.

Sections 16006, 16017, 16021, 16066, 16088, 16091, and 16093 to 16100, inclusive, shall be applicable to the administration of this article unless the context of this article as determined by the board, requires otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16341.

Whenever a school district receives or has received an apportionment under this article for the purchase of a site which contains existing improvements, the board may require the district to dispose of any existing improvements that a condition of receiving an apportionment in any manner that the board deems proper. Whenever a district sells, leases or disposes of any site acquired under an apportionment or any improvements appurtenant to any site so acquired it shall contribute a portion of the net proceeds therefrom or the value of any consideration received
 therefor, in reduction of any apportionment, such portion being proportionate to the state’s participation in the project.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16342.

To determine the effect of school housing aid for reorganized districts, the applicable portions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150) of this chapter shall apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16343.

Whenever a conditional apportionment has, prior to January 1, 1980, been made to an applicant school district pursuant to this chapter and thereafter the county superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over such district has certified to the board and the Controller that at an election called, held and conducted in the district for that purpose, the qualified electors of the district voting thereat authorized the governing board of the applicant school district, by the same majority vote required at a district bond election, to accept, expend and
 repay an apportionment under the provisions of this chapter, and whenever thereafter said county superintendent of schools has certified to the board and the Controller that the required contribution of the district has been placed on deposit in the state school building fund of the district and the board has certified to the Controller that the apportionment to the applicant school district has become final, such final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated, and any expenditure of money from the State School Building Aid Fund or the School Building Safety Fund according to the terms of such final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no funds authorized by any bond act for the purpose of this chapter shall be made available for expenditure without specific authority of the board or its delegated representative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16344.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16319, if a school district otherwise eligible to receive an apportionment under this article operates sufficient continuous school programs (as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37600) of Part 22) to provide housing for students displaced from structurally inadequate facilities, the costs of modifying any existing facilities necessary for the implementation of any continuous school programs shall be eligible, upon the review and recommendation of the State Department of Education, for an apportionment under this
 article from the proceeds of bonds remaining from the authorization provided in the State School Building Aid Law of 1966.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. School Construction Law of 1957 [16500. - 16592.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16500. - 16504.]

16500.

This chapter may be cited as the “State Project Area School Construction Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.

In recognition of the impact which certain major state construction projects have on local school district building needs in the areas in which the projects are constructed, the Legislature declares that it is the policy of the state to bear a proportionate share of the construction costs of school buildings in the area affected in the manner and to the extent provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16502.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “State project” means any construction project undertaken by the state, or the state and federal government jointly, which will cause a sudden influx of people into the area affected and where sufficient housing, schools, and other community facilities are not available. For the purposes of this subdivision, the Governor is hereby empowered to proclaim any major construction project undertaken by the state as a “state project” and define the area affected or likely to be affected thereby if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The Governor finds that the construction project will cause a sudden influx of people into the area.

(2) The Governor is requested to do so by the county board of supervisors.

The proclamation shall be in writing and shall take effect immediately. As soon thereafter as possible it shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Education for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(d) “Project” means the purposes for which a school district has applied for an apportionment.

(e) “Construction project” means the purposes for which a school district has applied for an apportionment at a given location.

(f) “Grade level maintained by a district” means any of the following:

(1) The kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 6, or grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by an elementary school district or a unified school district.

(2) Grades 7 to 12, inclusive, grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or grades 7 to 10, inclusive, maintained by a high school district or unified school district, but not more than one grade level shall be claimed by any district under any one of the paragraphs of this subdivision.

(g) “Apportionment” means an apportionment made under this chapter unless the context otherwise requires.

(h) “Project children” means children of parents who have come to the district subsequent to the start of the state project and who are employed by the State of California or the federal government in connection with a state project and children of parents employed by any contractor or subcontractor of a state project.

(i) “Indirect project children” means children of parents who have come to the district subsequent to the start of the state project and who are not employed by a contractor or subcontractor of a state project but who are children in the area in addition to those which would be expected as a result of normal development and growth of the area as determined pursuant to regulations of the director which he or she is hereby authorized to adopt.

(j) “Parent” includes a legal guardian or other person standing in loco parentis.

(k) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16503.

The Director of General Services shall administer this chapter and shall provide any assistance to the board that it may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.

A fund in the State Treasury is hereby created, to be known as the State School Construction Fund. All money in the State School Construction Fund, including any money deposited in the fund from any source whatsoever after September 11, 1957, is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for expenditure pursuant to apportionments made under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Apportionments [16520. - 16528.]

16520.

Apportionment from the State School Construction Fund to school districts shall be made in the manner and subject to the conditions herein provided and in accordance with policies adopted by the board, for any of the following purposes:

(a) The purchase and improvement of schoolsites which have been approved by the department.

(b) The purchase of desks, tables, chairs, and equipment, as approved by the department.

(c) The planning and construction, reconstruction, alteration of, and addition to, school buildings for facilities that are approved by the department as essential, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works.

Where a district is required by a contract entered into between itself and a contractor, to obtain at its own expense insurance covering risks incurred during any construction, reconstruction or alteration for which an apportionment has been made, the cost thereof may be paid either directly, or by way of reimbursement, to the district out of the apportionment, or out of any apportionment made specifically covering the insurance. However, in other respects the apportionments are eligible for payment under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.

In addition to the purposes for which apportionments may be made to school districts under Section 16520, apportionments may also be made to school districts for the construction, repair, attachment or development of offsite facilities, utilities or improvements which the board determines are necessary to the proper operation or functioning of the school facilities for which apportionments are made, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16522.

In making applications for, and in expending, apportionments of funds under this chapter, a district acts as an agent of the state and all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to through the expenditure of funds apportioned under this chapter, are declared to be, and are, the property of the state. Upon the payment by the district of the amounts required to be paid by it to the state under this chapter, the board shall, in the name of the state, convey the property to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.

The board may require school districts to insure for the benefit of the state all sites, equipment, and buildings which are the property of the state, against any risks and in any amounts that the board may deem necessary to protect the interests of the state. No state funds apportioned under this chapter shall be used to pay the premiums on the insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16524.

A district shall be eligible to an apportionment under this chapter if the estimated number of project children and indirect project children who will be in average daily attendance in the schools of the district during the period of the state project is at least 25 and is at least 5 percent of the estimated number of all children who will be in average daily attendance in the schools of the district during the current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.

Any eligible school district may make application for an apportionment for a grade level which it maintains by submitting through the governing board an application therefor in a form and number that the board shall prescribe. The application shall be addressed to the board and shall set forth a project for the construction of school facilities for the district in accordance with this section.

(a) Each application and copy thereof shall contain and be supported by:

(1) A description of the project and the site therefor, preliminary drawings of the school facilities to be constructed thereon, and any other information relating to the project that the board may require.

(2) A statement of the estimated cost of the project certified by an architect or structural engineer.

(3) Evidence that the district has or will have title to the site upon which the facilities as specified in the application will be constructed.

(4) Assurance that the district will cause the work on the project to be commenced within a reasonable time and prosecuted to completion with reasonable diligence.

(b) The board shall require any changes in the plans which an applicant school district submits with its application that the board determines is necessary or desirable to assure completion of the project with available funds of the district and the amount of the apportionment to which the district is entitled under this chapter. For that purpose the board may delegate to the director or the Director of General Services, according to whether the subject matter of the revision of the plans is subject to the jurisdiction and approval of the director or the Director of General Services, the authority to require any revision in the plans that the board deems necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this subdivision.

(c) Upon submission of an application for an apportionment under this chapter the Director of General Services shall do each of the following:

(1) Transmit a copy of the application to the director who shall as promptly as possible prepare a report and recommendation with respect thereto. Thereupon the director shall transmit his or her report and recommendation to the Director of General Services who shall refer them to the board if he or she finds them in proper form and otherwise sufficient. If the Director of General Services finds the documents to be lacking in any respect as to any matter subject to the jurisdiction of the director or the department, he or she shall refer them to the director who shall take any action that may be necessary.

(2) Determine the applicant district’s financial ability with funds apportioned under this chapter and funds devoted by the district to the project to meet the cost of the project and submit his or her report thereon as promptly as possible to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16526.

At the next regular meeting of the board following the submission of the reports and recommendations required by Section 16525, the board shall, subject to this chapter, approve or reject the application. If the board approves the application, it shall by resolution adopted by it, apportion to the district from the State School Construction Fund the amount applied for, or any portion thereof that the board determines proper. This shall be known as a conditional apportionment and shall become final only if the vote provided for in Section 16527 is favorable. The conditional apportionment shall remain in effect for a period of nine months from the date of the resolution of the board. If the apportionment does not become final within the time prescribed, it shall become void and the money so apportioned shall again become available for apportionment pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16527.

No apportionment to a school district under this chapter shall become final, nor shall any agreement authorized by Section 16528 be entered into, unless at an election called by the governing board of the district, two-thirds of the qualified electors of the district voting thereat have authorized the governing board to accept, expend, and repay an apportionment as provided in this chapter or, with respect to an agreement authorized by Section 16528, to obligate the district in an amount equal to or in excess of the maximum amount which the district could be obligated by the agreement, or by any act of its governing board, or for which it is responsible, contemplated, or permitted under the agreement. The election shall be called, held, and conducted in the same manner as are elections to authorize the issuance of district bonds, except that the ballot shall contain substantially the following words:

“Shall the governing board of the district be authorized (1) to accept and expend an apportionment from the State of California under and subject to the provisions of the State Project Area School Construction Law, a portion of which amount is subject to repayment as provided by that law, or (2) to enter into an agreement or agreements with the state pursuant to Section 16528 of the Education Code, which will at the time of the agreement or agreements (or at the time of any subsequent act of the governing board, or for which it is responsible, contemplated or permitted thereby) commit the district to a total expenditure in connection with all of these agreements of not more than ____ dollars, or both. Yes___ No___.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16528.

(a) In addition to the powers granted the board under this chapter, the board shall have authority to do each of the following:

(1) Make apportionments to districts for the purchase of sites only, or for the construction or purchase of temporary or portable buildings, and for the cost of site preparation, including any necessary utility costs, in connection with their utilization.

(2) Establish standards in conjunction with the State Department of Education pertaining to the sites and buildings as a condition for making the apportionment. In addition the board may also expend moneys from the State School Construction Fund directly for the construction, acquisition, storage, maintenance, and repair of the buildings, including administrative costs related thereto. In the latter event the board may lease, sell, or transfer under a lease-purchase agreement the buildings to school districts eligible for aid under this chapter, under the terms as it deems fit. Agreements pertaining thereto may provide for the payment by the state of site preparation costs, including any necessary utility costs, sufficient to permit their utilization.

(b) Whenever the board deems it economically desirable to do so the board may dispose of any facilities acquired or constructed directly by it under this section to any public or private parties under the terms and in the manner as the board deems fit, save insofar as the disposal is inconsistent with any agreement under this section between the board and an affected district. The board is authorized to do any and all things necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section, and any eligible school district is authorized to enter into an agreement with the board to carry out the purposes hereof.

(c) Any buildings leased for placement on the school property or under a purchase or a lease-purchase agreement shall be deemed the construction or alteration of a school building as those terms are defined in Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive.

(d) The consideration provided by any agreement between the state and districts pursuant to this section shall as nearly as possible reflect an amount which would return to the state a fair pro rata proportion of its capital investment and expenditures connected therewith in the light of the benefits conferred by the agreement. The consideration shall be paid by the districts promptly when due, and Section 16573 shall not be deemed applicable to reduce the consideration, provided that the amounts so repaid shall be redeposited in the State School Construction Fund.

(e) No agreement shall be entered into under this section unless the department has, with respect thereto, or as a condition of making the agreement, approved each of the following items:

(1) The property to be transferred, including any incidental construction pertaining thereto.

(2) Whether the agreement shall be by lease or sale.

(3) The term of the transfer, if less than a sale, including any contingent or indefinite term.

“Sale” as used in this subdivision includes a lease-purchase transaction. The jurisdiction of the department shall not otherwise extend to the terms of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Apportionments, Computation [16540. - 16543.]

16540.

The board shall compute for each applicant school district the amount to which the district is entitled under this chapter in the manner prescribed by this article. The amount so computed shall be reduced by the amount received or to be received by the district under Public Law 815 of the 81st Congress, as amended, or any similar provisions of any other act of Congress, solely on account of the participation of the federal government in the state project or shall be reduced by the percentage of the cost of the project (as that term is defined in Section 41930) borne by the federal government, whichever is the greater amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16541.

In the computation of the apportionments to applicant school districts, the board may utilize the facilities and services of any department or agency of the state and may delegate the performance of any duties or functions, except those specifically delegated by this chapter to the director or department, to any officer or employee thereof as the board deems necessary and proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16542.

The board shall multiply:

(a) The estimated number of project children in the district by the current construction cost per pupil in the area of the state project.

(b) The estimated number of indirect project children in the district by the current construction cost per pupil in the area, multiplied by 55 percent.

(c) “Current construction cost per pupil” as used in this section means the average per pupil cost of constructing complete school facilities for the grade level maintained by the district for which application for an apportionment is made under this chapter.

(d) The total of the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be apportioned to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16543.

(a) The average per pupil cost of constructing complete school facilities in the area of the state project for the purposes of this article shall be determined by the board, after consultation with the department and the Department of General Services, on the basis of information obtained thereby and any other information that may be available to the department.

(b) Estimates of the number of project children and indirect project children for the purpose of this article shall be made by the applicant school district in accordance with rules prescribed by the director and shall be made as of the time the greatest number of such children will attend the schools of the district as a result of the state project. The estimates shall be made on the basis of the best information available to the district at the time of the application. Approval of the estimates by the director, in whole or in part, shall be on the basis of the best information available to the director at the time of the approval. In the approval of estimates of the number of project children and indirect project children for the purposes of this article the director may utilize the facilities and services of any department or agency of the state as he or she deems necessary and proper. No estimate shall be used as a basis of an apportionment that has not been approved by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Apportionments, Payment [16550. - 16557.]

16550.

Immediately after the result of the election required by Section 16527 has been determined, the county superintendent of schools shall make a certificate in duplicate stating whether the district has authorized the acceptance and expenditure of the apportionment. One copy of the certificate shall be sent to the board and one copy to the Controller. Upon the receipt by the board of the certificate, the apportionment shall become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16551.

The election by a school district upon the acceptance, expenditure, and repayment of an apportionment prescribed by Section 16527 may be called and held either before or after the making of an apportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16552.

Payment shall be made in accordance with the terms of a final apportionment, to a school district for expenditures, or commitments therefor, which have been made by the district subsequent to the date of the proclamation of the Governor proclaiming a state project in the area including the district, for any items approved by the board in the apportionment. However, if expenditures were made for, or work was commenced with respect to, any item so approved, prior to the time the application of the district containing the item was received by the board, payment or reimbursement for the item shall be made only upon authorization of the board by special resolution citing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16553.

The board shall prescribe in the detail that it deems necessary, the purposes for which moneys apportioned by it to a district under this chapter may be expended and the prescription shall be binding upon the governing board of the district except that it may be, for good cause, modified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16554.

Each apportionment made by the board under this chapter shall be certified by it to the Controller who shall thereupon draw his or her warrant on the State Treasury in favor of the county treasurer of the county having jurisdiction over the district. The warrant shall be paid by the Treasurer from the State School Construction Fund and is not subject to the provisions of Section 925.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16555.

The county treasurer of each county shall pay all moneys received by him or her under this chapter into the county treasury to the credit of the state school construction fund of the district, which fund is hereby created, exactly as apportioned by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16556.

The governing board of each school district to which an apportionment has been made under this chapter shall expend the moneys in the state school construction fund of the district only for the purposes for which the moneys were apportioned to the district and for no other purpose and shall make any reports relating to the expenditure of the moneys that the board and the Controller shall require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16557.

It shall be the duty of the Controller to make any audit or audits of the books and records of counties and school districts receiving apportionments under this chapter, that he or she may deem necessary from time to time, for the purpose of determining that the money received by school districts as apportionments hereunder has been expended for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Apportionments, Repayment [16570. - 16577.]

16570.

Each school district to which an apportionment is made under this chapter shall repay the principal amount of the apportionment in the manner prescribed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16571.

For purposes of computing the repayment, the state project shall be deemed completed on June 30th of the fiscal year in which the state project is completed and accepted by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16572.

The principal amount of the apportionment shall be computed and repaid in the manner prescribed in this article.

(a) On or before the first day of January succeeding the completion of the state project, the Controller shall compute the annual repayment of each apportionment for each grade level maintained by the district, as follows:

(1) He or she shall determine from the certification of the director the total amount of average daily attendance of project children, and the total amount of average daily attendance of indirect project children, in attendance in the grade level maintained by the district for the period commencing with the date of the proclamation of the Governor proclaiming the existence of a state project in the area including the district and ending on June 30th of the fiscal year in which the state project is completed.

(2) He or she shall divide the average daily attendance of the project children by 30 and multiply the quotient by the amount determined by the board pursuant to Section 16543 as the average per pupil cost of construction in the area of the state project.

(3) He or she shall multiply the average daily attendance of the indirect project children by 55 percent. The product shall be divided by 30 and the quotient multiplied by the amount determined by the board pursuant to Section 16543 as the average per pupil cost of construction in the area of the state project.

(4) The total of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall be subtracted from the amount of the apportionment to the district. The remainder shall be divided by 30 and the quotient shall constitute the amount of the annual repayment of the apportionment.

(5) Upon application of the district and approval by the board, the total amount of the repayment may be paid in a lump sum or in fewer than 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16573.

If on June 30th of the fiscal year in which the state project is completed there is classroom space constructed with funds apportioned under this chapter, that is not being used by the district, the board shall, upon application of the district, reduce the total amount to be repaid by the district on a proportionate basis until the time that the classroom space is used by the district. No payment shall be required by the district for the period during which the classroom space is not used by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16574.

The Controller shall, during the fiscal year in which he or she determines the annual repayment as provided in Section 16572, and for each subsequent fiscal year not exceeding 30, deduct the total amount of the annual repayment of each district in equal amounts from each of the February, March, April, and May installments of the apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 92 or 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, and, on order of the Controller, the amount so deducted shall be transferred to the General Fund of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16575.

Upon computing in any fiscal year the amount to be deducted from the apportionments to the district from the State School Fund during the fiscal year, the Controller shall notify the governing board of the district and the county auditor of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over the district, of the amount to be deducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16576.

The board of supervisors of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over any district which under this chapter will have moneys withheld by the Controller from the apportionments to be made to it from the State School Fund during any fiscal year, shall annually at the time the board of supervisors makes the next levy of taxes for county purposes, levy a tax upon the property in the district sufficient to raise for the district the amount of money withheld by the Controller during the fiscal year preceding that in which the tax is levied. The tax, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury of the county, the county superintendent of schools of which has jurisdiction over the district for which the tax was levied, to the credit of the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16577.

Notwithstanding Section 16572 to the contrary, if on or before June 30th of the fiscal year in which the state project is completed the district has received a final apportionment under Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive, or if at any time thereafter the district receives a final apportionment under Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive, the amount of the apportionment to the district under this chapter then remaining unpaid shall, upon request of the district, be added to the principal amount of the apportionment made to the district under Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive. Thereupon the apportionment made to the district under this chapter shall be deemed to be an apportionment made to the district under Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive, and subject to repayment in the manner therein prescribed, except that no interest shall be charged or collected upon the amount which is added to the principal amount of the apportionment made to the district under Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive. For the purposes of Section 16083, any amount added to the principal amount of an apportionment pursuant to this section shall be deemed to have become final and disbursed to the district on the date the state project is deemed completed pursuant to Section 16571.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [16590. - 16592.]

16590.
